Utah statutes.
67-4a-901.   Duty to comply with prior law.
(1)  This chapter does not relieve a holder of any duty that arose before the
effective date of this chapter to report, pay, or deliver property.
(2)  A holder who did not comply with the prior law is subject to the
applicable enforcement and penalty provisions that existed under that law.
